Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.425

Termination of listing of commercial registered agent.

(1) A commercial registered agent may terminate its listing as a commercial registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a commercial-registered-agent termination statement executed by the agent which states:

(a) The name of the agent as listed under RCW 23.95.420; and

(b) That the agent is no longer in the business of serving as a commercial registered agent in this state.

(2) A commercial-registered-agent termination statement takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the 31st day after the day on which it is delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(3) The commercial registered agent promptly shall furnish each entity represented by the agent notice in a record of the filing of the commercial-registered-agent termination statement.

(4) When a commercial-registered-agent termination statement takes effect, the commercial registered agent ceases to be the registered agent for each entity formerly represented by it. Until an entity formerly represented by a terminated commercial registered agent designates a new registered agent, service of process may be made on the entity pursuant to RCW 23.95.450. Termination of the listing of a commercial registered agent under this section does not affect any contractual rights a represented entity has against the agent or that the agent has against the entity.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1406.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.